Arkansas, session 2025, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-12-110(c)(4), as enacted by Initiated
Act 1 of 2000, also known as the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, concerning
the creation of the Targeted State Needs Program Account, is amended to read
as follows:
(4)(A) Minority Health Initiative and a grant program for
school-based health centers, administered by the Arkansas Minority Health
Commission — twenty-three per cent (23%).
(B) The grant program for school-based health centers
shall receive five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually from the
percentage under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section.

*JMB085*
02/04/2025 1:15:12 PM JMB085

HB1402
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-12-114, as enacted by Initiated Act 1 of
2000, also known as the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, concerning the
establishment and administration of the Targeted State Needs Program, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(j)(1) The Arkansas Minority Health Commission shall establish and
administer the grant program for school-based health centers to provide
funding for school-based health centers exclusively in minority-majority
school districts.
(2) The distribution of the grant program under subdivision
(j)(1) of this section shall mirror the Arkansas School-Based Health Center
Grant Program, or a successor grant program, that supports school-based
health centers and is administered by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education of the Department of Education and the Department of
Health.
(3) The Arkansas Minority Health Commission shall establish
rules similar to the rules of the Arkansas School-Based Health Center Grant
Program, or a successor grant program.
(4) As used in this subsection, "minority-majority school
district" means a school district where members of a racial or ethnic
minority are the majority of the population in the school district.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Arkansas Minority Health Commission shall file the final rules with the
Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The commission shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.




02/04/2025 1:15:12 PM JMB085